Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.140

Increase in assessments by referendum.

The producers of tree fruit subject to the provisions of this chapter may subsequent to approving initial assessment increase such assessment by referendum when approved by a majority of the producers voting.

[ 1969 c 129 s 14.]